Maryland, session 2025, HB0187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
8–524.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COERCION” MEANS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0187*

HOUSE BILL 187
(I) 1. CAUSING OR THREATENING TO CAUSE BODILY HARM
TO AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
2. PHYSICALLY RESTRAINING OR CONFINING OR
THREATENING TO PHYSICALLY RESTRAIN OR CONFINE AN INDIVIDUAL;
(II) EXPOSING OR DISSEMINATING OR THREATENING TO
EXPOSE OR DISSEMINATE ANY FACT OR INFORMATION THAT WOULD TEND TO
SUBJECT AN INDIVIDUAL TO CRIMINAL OR IMMIGRATION PROCEEDINGS, HATRED,
CONTEMPT, OR RIDICULE;
(III) DESTROYING, CONCEALING, REMOVING, CONFISCATING, OR
POSSESSING ANY ACTUAL OR PURPORTED PASSPORT OR OTHER IMMIGRATION
DOCUMENT, OR ANY OTHER ACTUAL OR PURPORTED GOVERNMENT IDENTIFICATION
DOCUMENT, OF AN INDIVIDUAL;
(IV) PROVIDING A CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE TO AN
INDIVIDUAL FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPELLING THE INDIVIDUAL TO ENGAGE IN AN
ACTION AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL’S WILL;
(V) CAUSING OR THREATENING TO CAUSE FINANCIAL HARM TO
AN INDIVIDUAL OR EXERTING FINANCIAL CONTROL OVER A DISABLED OR ELDERLY
ADULT; OR
(VI) DEPRIVING AN INDIVIDUAL OF MEDICAL CARE.
(3) “CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 5–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “DECEPTION” MEANS:
(I) CREATING OR CONFIRMING ANOTHER PERSON’S
IMPRESSION OF AN EXISTING FACT OR PAST EVENT THAT IS FALSE AND THAT THE
ACCUSED KNOWS OR BELIEVES TO BE FALSE; OR
(II) PROMISING BENEFITS OR THE PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES
THAT THE ACCUSED DOES NOT INTEND TO DELIVER OR PERFORM OR KNOWS WILL
NOT BE DELIVERED OR PERFORMED.
(5) “EXPLOITATION” MEANS ILLEGALLY OR IMPROPERLY USING AN
INDIVIDUAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL’S GOVERNMENT BENEFITS THROUGH UNDUE
INFLUENCE, HARASSMENT, DURESS, FALSE REPRESENTATION, FALSE PRETENSE,
OR OTHER SIMILAR MEANS FOR PERSONAL PROFIT OR ADVANTAGE OR FOR THE
PROFIT OR ADVANTAGE OF ANOTHER.

HOUSE BILL 187 3
(6) “GOVERNMENT BENEFITS” INCLUDES:
(I) MEDICARE BENEFITS;
(II) MEDICAID BENEFITS;
(III) TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF)
BENEFITS;
(IV) SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION PROGRAM FOR
WOMEN, INFANTS, AND CHILDREN (WIC) BENEFITS;
(V) SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
(SNAP) BENEFITS;
(VI) SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS;
(VII) SOCIAL SECURITY DISABILITY (SSDI) BENEFITS;
(VIII) VETERANS BENEFITS;
(IX) PENSION BENEFITS;
(X) TEMPORARY DISABILITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (TDAP)
BENEFITS; AND
(XI) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE TO ADULTS (PAA) BENEFITS.
(7) “ISOLATION” MEANS PREVENTING AN INDIVIDUAL FROM HAVING
CONTACT WITH FRIENDS OR FAMILY, A WELFARE AGENCY, LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS, HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS, OR OTHER INDIVIDUALS OR ENTITIES
WITHOUT THE KNOWLEDGE OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL’S
WISHES.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT, THROUGH DECEPTION, COERCION,
EXPLOITATION, ISOLATION, OR ANY OTHER MEANS, KNOWINGLY RECRUIT, HARBOR,
TRANSPORT, OR OBTAIN AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE PURPOSE OF APPROPRIATING THE
GOVERNMENT BENEFITS OF AN INDIVIDUAL FOR PERSONAL BENEFIT OR TO
BENEFIT ANOTHER.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY BENEFIT FINANCIALLY OR BY
RECEIVING ANYTHING OF VALUE FROM PARTICIPATION IN A VENTURE THAT
VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 187
(3) A PERSON MAY NOT AID, ABET, OR CONSPIRE WITH ONE OR MORE
PERSONS TO VIOLATE PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY
OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING
25 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $15,000 OR BOTH.
(D) (1) EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSIDERED A
SEPARATE OFFENSE.
(2) A CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT MERGE WITH A
CONVICTION FOR ANY OTHER CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.